Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF666.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko H.F. 666 Section 1. FINDINGS. 1 1. The general assembly acknowledges that all human beings 2 are created equal and endowed by their creator with certain 3 unalienable rights, the foremost of which is the right to life. 4 2. The life of every human being begins at fertilization 5 when a male sperm fuses with a female egg resulting in a 6 single-celled human called a zygote. The union of the male 7 and female deoxyribonucleic acid during fertilization restores 8 the number of chromosomes needed to create a new human being. 9 The Carnegie stages of human development, numbered one to 10 twenty-three, is the accepted standard of embryological 11 development used by biologists to describe the physical 12 features of the human being, with the first stage marked by the 13 moment of fertilization through sperm-egg fusion and the last 14 stage at an estimated postfertilization age of eight weeks when 15 over ninety percent of the more than four thousand five hundred 16 named body structures are present. 17 3. The state of Iowa has a fundamental and compelling 18 interest in protecting the life of every human being from the 19 moment of fertilization. 20 4. Abortion is a murderous act of violence that purposefully 21 and knowingly terminates a human life in the womb. 22 5. Unborn human beings are entitled to the full and equal 23 protection of the laws that prohibit violence against other 24 human beings. 25 6. The United States Supreme Courtâs ruling in Dobbs v. 26 Jackson Womenâs Health Organization, No. 19-1392, 597 U.S. ___ 27 (2022), correctly overruled the lawless and unconstitutional 28 pronouncements in Roe v. Wade, 410 U.S. 113 (1973) and Planned 29 Parenthood of Southeastern Pennsylvania v. Casey, 505 U.S. 30 833 (1992), which had invented and perpetuated a supposed 31 constitutional right to abortion that cannot be found anywhere 32 in the text of the Constitution of the United States. 33 7. It is a federal crime pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Â§1461 to 34 mail abortion pills or to receive them in the mail, punishable 35 -1- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 1/ 51 H.F. 666 by imprisonment for five years. It is also a federal crime 1 to transport abortion pills in interstate or foreign commerce 2 pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Â§1462(c). These statutes are fully 3 enforceable now that Roe v. Wade, 410 U.S. 113 (1973), has been 4 overruled. The statute of limitations for each of these crimes 5 is five years. 6 8. Violations of 18 U.S.C. Â§1461 and Â§1462 are predicate 7 offenses under the federal Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt 8 Organizations Act (RICO), which exposes abortion pill 9 distribution networks and their donors to civil RICO liability 10 as well as criminal prosecution as a racketeering enterprise 11 under 18 U.S.C. Â§1961. 12 9. The general assembly calls upon the United States 13 attorneys for the northern and southern districts of Iowa to 14 investigate and prosecute every abortion pill distribution 15 network under 18 U.S.C. Â§1461 and Â§1462 and RICO. 16 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 146F.1 Short title. 17 This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the âIowa 18 Human Life Protection Actâ . 19 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 146F.2 Definitions. 20 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 21 requires: 22 1. âAbortion fundâ means a person that exists for the 23 purpose of aiding or abetting elective abortions, and that pays 24 for, reimburses, or subsidizes in any way the costs associated 25 with obtaining an elective abortion. 26 2. âAbortion-inducing drugâ means mifepristone, misoprostol, 27 and any other medicine, drug, or other substance that is 28 prescribed, dispensed, distributed, possessed, or used with the 29 intent of terminating a clinically diagnosable pregnancy, with 30 knowledge that the termination will with reasonable likelihood 31 cause the death of the unborn child. âAbortion-inducing 32 drugâ includes the off-label use of drugs known to have 33 abortion-inducing properties which are prescribed, dispensed, 34 distributed, possessed, or used specifically with the 35 -2- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 2/ 51 H.F. 666 intent of terminating a clinically diagnosable pregnancy. 1 âAbortion-inducing drugâ does not include any of the following: 2 a. Levenorgestrel, also known as plan b one-step or the 3 morning-after pill, intrauterine devices, or any other type of 4 contraception or emergency contraception. 5 b. Drugs that may be known to cause an abortion, but which 6 are prescribed, dispensed, distributed, possessed, or used for 7 a purpose that does not include the termination of a clinically 8 diagnosable pregnancy. 9 3. âAbortion providerâ means a person who performs elective 10 abortions. 11 4. âAffiliateâ means a person that with another person 12 enters into a legal relationship created or governed by at 13 least one written instrument, including a certificate of 14 formation, a franchise agreement, standards of affiliation, 15 bylaws, or a license, that demonstrates any of the following: 16 a. Common ownership, management, or control between the 17 parties to the relationship. 18 b. A franchise granted by the person or entity to the 19 affiliate. 20 c. The granting or extension of a license or other agreement 21 authorizing the affiliate to use the other personâs brand name, 22 trademark, service mark, or other registered identification 23 mark. 24 5. âAiding or abettingâ or âaid or abetâ means the same as 25 defined in section 703.1. 26 6. âAttemptâ or âattemptsâ relating to an elective abortion 27 means an act, or an omission of a statutorily required act, 28 that, under the circumstances as the actor believes them to be, 29 constitutes a substantial step in a course of conduct planned 30 to culminate in the performance of an elective abortion. 31 7. âElective abortionâ means the act of using, prescribing, 32 administering, procuring, or selling any instrument, medicine, 33 drug, or any other substance, device, or means with the purpose 34 of terminating a clinically diagnosed pregnancy of a woman, 35 -3- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 3/ 51 H.F. 666 with knowledge that the termination by any of those means will, 1 with reasonable likelihood, cause the death of an unborn child. 2 âElective abortionâ does not include any of the following: 3 a. In vitro fertilization or fertility treatments of any 4 type. 5 b. The use, prescription, administration, procuring, or 6 selling of levenorgestrel, also known as plan b one-step or the 7 morning-after pill, intrauterine devices, or any other type of 8 contraception or emergency contraception. 9 c. An act performed with the intent to do any of the 10 following: 11 (1) Save the life or preserve the health of an unborn child. 12 (2) Remove a dead unborn child as the result of a 13 spontaneous abortion, commonly known as a miscarriage. 14 (3) Remove or treat an ectopic pregnancy. 15 (4) Treat a physiological condition which the physician 16 deems, in the physicianâs reasonable medical judgment, to be a 17 medical emergency. 18 d. A spontaneous abortion, commonly known as a miscarriage. 19 e. Medical treatment provided to a pregnant woman by a 20 licensed physician if the intent of the medical treatment is 21 not to cause an elective abortion, even if that treatment 22 results in the accidental death of, or unintentional injury to 23 or death of, the unborn child. 24 f. A medically indicated separation procedure. 25 8. âFertilizationâ means the fusion of a human spermatozoon 26 with a human ovum. 27 9. âGovernmental entityâ means this state, a state agency 28 in the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of state 29 government of this state, or a political subdivision of this 30 state. 31 10. âInformation content providerâ means a person that 32 is responsible, in whole or in part, for the creation or 33 development of information provided through the internet or any 34 other interactive computer service. 35 -4- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 4/ 51 H.F. 666 11. âInteractive computer serviceâ means any information 1 service, system, or access software provider that provides or 2 enables computer access by multiple users to a computer server, 3 including specifically a service or system that provides access 4 to the internet and such systems operated or services offered 5 by libraries or educational institutions. 6 12. âMajor bodily functionâ includes but is not limited 7 to functions of the immune system, normal cell growth, and 8 digestive, bowel, bladder, neurological, brain, respiratory, 9 circulatory, endocrine, and reproductive functions. 10 13. âMedical emergencyâ means a situation in which a 11 medically indicated separation procedure or treatment for 12 a physiological condition is performed due to any of the 13 following: 14 a. To preserve the life of a pregnant woman whose life 15 is endangered by a physical disorder, physical illness, or 16 physical injury, or a life-endangering physical condition 17 caused by or arising from the pregnancy including an ectopic 18 pregnancy, but not including psychological conditions, 19 emotional conditions, familial conditions, or the womanâs age. 20 b. When continuation of the pregnancy will create a serious 21 risk of substantial and irreversible impairment of a major 22 bodily function of a pregnant woman. 23 14. âMedically indicated separation procedureâ means 24 a medical intervention, the purpose of which is not to 25 terminate a clinically diagnosed pregnancy of a woman, that is 26 necessitated by a medical emergency. A âmedically indicated 27 separation procedureâ is not an elective abortion. 28 15. âPerformâ , âperformanceâ , âperformedâ , âperformsâ , or 29 âperformingâ , relative to an elective abortion, means the use 30 of any means, including surgical or abortion-inducing drugs, 31 to terminate a clinically diagnosed pregnancy with the intent 32 other than to produce a live birth or to remove a dead fetus. 33 16. âPersonâ means the same as defined in section 4.1. 34 17. âPolicyâ includes a formal, written rule, policy, 35 -5- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 5/ 51 H.F. 666 procedure, regulation, order, ordinance, motion, resolution, or 1 amendment and an informal, unwritten policy. 2 18. âPolitical subdivisionâ means a city, county, township, 3 or school district. 4 19. âPregnantâ means the human female reproductive condition 5 of having a living unborn child within the human femaleâs 6 uterus. 7 20. âTaxpayer resource transactionâ means a sale, purchase, 8 lease, donation of money, goods, services, or real property, 9 or any other transaction between a governmental entity and a 10 private entity that provides to the private entity something of 11 value derived from state or local tax revenue, regardless of 12 whether the governmental entity receives something of value in 13 return. âTaxpayer resource transactionâ includes advocacy or 14 lobbying by or on behalf of a governmental entity on behalf of 15 the interests of an abortion provider or affiliate but does not 16 include any of the following: 17 a. The provision of basic public services, including fire 18 and police protection and utilities, by a governmental entity 19 to an abortion fund, abortion provider, or an affiliate of an 20 abortion provider in the same manner as the entity provides the 21 services to the general public. 22 b. An officer or employee of a governmental entity providing 23 information to a member of the general assembly or appearing 24 before a legislative committee at the request of the member or 25 committee. 26 c. An elected official advocating for or against or 27 otherwise influencing or attempting to influence the outcome of 28 legislation pending before the general assembly while acting in 29 the capacity of an elected official. 30 d. An individual communicating as a private citizen on a 31 matter of public concern. 32 21. âUnborn childâ means an individual organism of the 33 species homo sapiens from fertilization to live birth. 34 22. âWomanâ or âwomenâ includes every person whose 35 -6- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 6/ 51 H.F. 666 biological sex is female, including every person born with XX 1 chromosomes and a uterus, regardless of any gender identity 2 that the person attempts to assert or claim. 3 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 146F.3 Elective abortion ââ 4 prohibitions ââ exceptions ââ exclusive qui tam enforcement. 5 1. A person shall not knowingly use, employ, or administer 6 any drug, instrument, device, means, or procedure upon a 7 pregnant woman with the specific intent to cause an elective 8 abortion. 9 2. A person shall not knowingly aid or abet the conduct 10 described in subsection 1. 11 3. The prohibitions in this section shall apply if any 12 portion of the prohibited conduct or elective abortion occurs 13 in the state or within the jurisdiction of the state. 14 4. a. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 15 requirements of this section shall be enforced exclusively 16 through the qui tam actions described in sections 146F.7 and 17 146F.8. 18 b. Direct or indirect enforcement of this section shall not 19 be taken or threatened by a governmental entity or an officer 20 or employee of a governmental entity against a person by any 21 means, and a violation of this section shall not be used to 22 justify or trigger the enforcement of any other law or any type 23 of adverse consequence under any other law, except as provided 24 in sections 146F.7 and 146F.8. 25 c. This section does not preclude or limit the enforcement 26 of any other law or regulation against conduct that is 27 independently prohibited by such other law or regulation and 28 that would remain prohibited by such other law or regulation 29 in the absence of this section. 30 5. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 31 prohibitions in this section shall not apply to any of the 32 following: 33 a. Speech or conduct protected by the first amendment to the 34 Constitution of the United States, as made applicable to the 35 -7- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 7/ 51 H.F. 666 states through the United States supreme court interpretations 1 of the fourteenth amendment to the Constitution of the United 2 States, or by Article I, section 7, of the Constitution of the 3 State of Iowa. 4 b. Conduct that the state is forbidden to regulate under 5 federal law or the Constitution of the United States. 6 c. The provision of basic public services, including fire 7 and police protection and utilities, by a governmental entity 8 or a common carrier to an abortion provider, an abortion fund, 9 or an affiliate of an abortion provider or abortion fund in 10 the same manner as the governmental entity or common carrier 11 provides those services to the general public. 12 d. Conduct taken at the behest of a federal agency, 13 contractor, or employee that is carrying out duties under 14 federal law, if a prohibition on that conduct would violate the 15 doctrine of preemption or intergovernmental immunity. 16 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 146F.4 Liability for wrongful death 17 and personal injuries ââ elective abortion. 18 1. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a person 19 who violates section 146F.3 shall be subject to all of the 20 following: 21 a. Joint and several liability for the wrongful death of an 22 unborn child who dies from the elective abortion. 23 b. Strict, and joint and several liability for all of the 24 following: 25 (1) The wrongful death of a pregnant woman or formerly 26 pregnant woman who dies from the elective abortion. 27 (2) Any personal injuries suffered by an unborn child or 28 pregnant woman or formerly pregnant woman from the elective 29 abortion. 30 2. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, including 31 section 633.336, a surviving parent of an unborn child who was 32 aborted in violation of section 146F.3 may maintain an action 33 for wrongful death against a person who knowingly violated 34 section 146F.3 resulting in the wrongful death of the unborn 35 -8- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 8/ 51 H.F. 666 child. 1 3. A lawsuit shall not be brought under subsection 1 against 2 or by any of the following: 3 a. Against a pregnant woman or formerly pregnant woman 4 who aborted or attempted to abort the pregnant womanâs unborn 5 child. 6 b. Against a person that acted at the behest of a federal 7 agency, contractor, or employee that is carrying out duties 8 under federal law, if the imposition of liability would violate 9 the doctrine of preemption or intergovernmental immunity. 10 c. By a person who through an act of sexual assault or 11 incest impregnated the pregnant woman or formerly pregnant 12 woman. 13 d. Against a provider or user of an interactive computer 14 service if such a lawsuit would be preempted by 47 U.S.C. 15 Â§230(c). 16 4. A plaintiff who prevails in a personal injury or wrongful 17 death lawsuit under this section is entitled to recover all of 18 the following: 19 a. Compensatory damages, including but not limited to 20 damages for medical expenses, pain and suffering, and emotional 21 distress. 22 b. Court costs and reasonable attorney fees. 23 c. Punitive damages of not less than one hundred thousand 24 dollars. 25 5. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, if a 26 plaintiff who brings suit under this section in response to 27 a drug-induced abortion is unable to identify the specific 28 manufacturer of the abortion-inducing drug that caused the 29 death or injury, liability shall be apportioned among all 30 manufacturers of abortion-inducing drugs in proportion to each 31 manufacturerâs share of the market for abortion-inducing drugs. 32 6. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a person 33 may bring an action under this section no later than six years 34 from the date the cause of action accrues. 35 -9- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 9/ 51 H.F. 666 7. Any waiver or purported waiver of the right to sue under 1 this section shall be void as against public policy and shall 2 not be enforceable in any court. 3 8. This section shall not be construed to impose liability 4 on speech or conduct protected by the first amendment to the 5 Constitution of the United States, as made applicable to the 6 states through the United States supreme court interpretations 7 of the fourteenth amendment to the Constitution of the United 8 States, or by Article I, section 7, of the Constitution of the 9 State of Iowa. 10 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 146F.5 Abortion-inducing drugs ââ 11 prohibitions ââ qui tam enforcement. 12 1. Except as provided in subsection 2, it shall be unlawful 13 for a person to do any of the following: 14 a. Manufacture, possess, or distribute abortion-inducing 15 drugs in the state. 16 b. Mail, transport, deliver, or provide abortion-inducing 17 drugs in any manner to or from a person or location in the 18 state. 19 c. Engage in any conduct that constitutes aiding and 20 abetting the manufacture, possession, distribution, mailing, 21 transporting, delivery, or provision of abortion-inducing 22 drugs. 23 2. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 24 subsection 1 does not prohibit any of the following: 25 a. Speech or conduct protected by the first amendment to the 26 Constitution of the United States, as made applicable to the 27 states through the United States supreme court interpretations 28 of the fourteenth amendment to the Constitution of the United 29 States, or by Article I, section 7, of the Constitution of the 30 State of Iowa. 31 b. Conduct that the state is forbidden to regulate under 32 federal law or the Constitution of the United States. 33 c. Conduct taken at the behest of a federal agency, 34 contractor, or employee that is carrying out duties under 35 -10- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 10/ 51 H.F. 666 federal law, if a prohibition on that conduct would violate the 1 doctrine of preemption or intergovernmental immunity. 2 d. Conduct taken by a pregnant woman or formerly pregnant 3 woman who aborts or seeks to abort the womanâs unborn child. 4 e. The manufacture, possession, distribution, mailing, 5 transporting, delivery, or provision of abortion-inducing drugs 6 for a purpose that does not include termination of a pregnancy. 7 f. The possession of abortion-inducing drugs related to an 8 effort to entrap a person that violates this section. 9 g. Any of the conduct described in section 146F.8, 10 subsection 1. 11 3. a. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 12 requirements of this section shall be enforced exclusively 13 through the qui tam actions described in sections 146F.7 and 14 146F.8. 15 b. Direct or indirect enforcement of this section shall not 16 be taken or threatened by a governmental entity or an officer 17 or employee of a governmental entity against a person, by any 18 means, and violation of this section shall not be used to 19 justify or trigger the enforcement of any other law or any type 20 of adverse consequence under any other law, except as provided 21 in sections 146F.7 and 146F.8. 22 c. This section does not preclude or limit the enforcement 23 of any other law or regulation against conduct that is 24 independently prohibited by such other law or regulation, and 25 that would remain prohibited by such other law or regulation 26 in the absence of this section. 27 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 146F.6 Liability for wrongful death 28 and personal injuries ââ abortion-inducing drugs. 29 1. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a person 30 who manufactures, mails, distributes, transports, delivers, 31 or provides abortion-inducing drugs; or who aids or abets the 32 manufacture, mailing, distribution, transportation, delivery, 33 or provision of abortion-inducing drugs shall be strictly, 34 and jointly and severally liable for the wrongful death of 35 -11- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 11/ 51 H.F. 666 an unborn child or pregnant woman who dies from the use of 1 abortion-inducing drugs, and for any personal injuries suffered 2 by an unborn child or pregnant woman or formerly pregnant woman 3 from the use of abortion-inducing drugs. 4 2. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, including 5 section 633.336, the surviving parents of an unborn child 6 who was aborted in violation of section 146F.3 may maintain 7 an action for wrongful death against a person who knowingly 8 violated section 146F.3 resulting in the wrongful death of the 9 unborn child. 10 3. A lawsuit shall not be brought under subsection 1 against 11 or by any of the following: 12 a. Against a pregnant woman or formerly pregnant woman who 13 used or sought to obtain abortion-inducing drugs to abort or 14 attempt to abort her unborn child. 15 b. Against a person that acted at the behest of a federal 16 agency, contractor, or employee that is carrying out duties 17 under federal law, if the imposition of liability would violate 18 the doctrine of preemption or intergovernmental immunity. 19 c. By a person who, through an act of sexual assault or 20 incest, impregnated the woman who used abortion-inducing drugs. 21 d. Against a provider or user of an interactive computer 22 service if such a lawsuit would be preempted by 47 U.S.C. 23 Â§230(c). 24 4. A plaintiff who prevails in a personal injury or wrongful 25 death lawsuit under this section is entitled to recover all of 26 the following: 27 a. Compensatory damages, including but not limited to 28 damages for medical expenses, pain and suffering, and emotional 29 distress. 30 b. Court costs and reasonable attorney fees. 31 c. Punitive damages of not less than one hundred thousand 32 dollars. 33 5. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, if a 34 plaintiff who brings suit under this section in response to 35 -12- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 12/ 51 H.F. 666 a drug-induced abortion is unable to identify the specific 1 manufacturer of the abortion-inducing drug that caused the 2 death or injury, liability shall be apportioned among all 3 manufacturers of abortion-inducing drugs in proportion to each 4 manufacturerâs share of the market for abortion-inducing drugs. 5 6. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a person 6 may bring an action under this section no later than six years 7 from the date the cause of action accrues. 8 7. Any waiver or purported waiver of the right to sue under 9 this section shall be void as against public policy and shall 10 not be enforceable in any court. 11 8. a. It is an affirmative defense if a person sued under 12 this section was unaware that the person was engaged in the 13 conduct described in this section, and took every reasonable 14 precaution to ensure that the person would not manufacture, 15 mail, distribute, transport, deliver, provide, or aid or 16 abet the manufacture, mailing, distribution, transportation, 17 delivery, or provision of abortion-inducing drugs. 18 b. The defendant has the burden of proving an affirmative 19 defense under this subsection by a preponderance of the 20 evidence. 21 9. This section shall not be construed to impose liability 22 on speech or conduct protected by the first amendment to the 23 Constitution of the United States, as made applicable to the 24 states through the United States supreme court interpretations 25 of the fourteenth amendment to the Constitution of the United 26 States, or by Article I, section 7, of the Constitution of the 27 State of Iowa. 28 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 146F.7 Qui tam enforcement for certain 29 violations. 30 1. A person, other than a governmental entity or an officer 31 or employee of a governmental entity, has standing to bring and 32 may bring a qui tam action against a person that meets any of 33 the following conditions: 34 a. Violates any provision of section 146F.3, 146F.5, or 35 -13- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 13/ 51 H.F. 666 146F.14. 1 b. Intends to violate any provision of section 146F.3, 2 146F.5, or 146F.14. 3 2. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, an action 4 shall not be brought under this section against or by any of 5 the following: 6 a. Against the pregnant woman or formerly pregnant woman 7 upon whom an elective abortion was performed or induced or 8 attempted to be performed or induced in violation of this 9 chapter, or against a pregnant woman who intends to seek or who 10 seeks an elective abortion in violation of this chapter. 11 b. Against a person that performs, aids or abets, or 12 attempts to perform or aid or abet an elective abortion at 13 the behest of a federal agency, contractor, or employee that 14 is carrying out duties under federal law, if a prohibition on 15 elective abortion would violate the doctrine of preemption or 16 intergovernmental immunity. 17 c. Against a common carrier that transports a pregnant woman 18 to an abortion provider, if the common carrier is unaware that 19 the pregnant woman intends to abort the pregnant womanâs unborn 20 child. 21 d. Against a provider or user of an interactive computer 22 service if such a lawsuit would be preempted by 47 U.S.C. 23 Â§230(c). 24 e. By a person who, through an act of sexual assault 25 or incest, impregnated a woman who is seeking an elective 26 abortion, or a person who acts in concert or participation with 27 the person who impregnated the woman. 28 3. An action under this section shall be brought in the name 29 of the person and of the state. 30 4. If a plaintiff prevails in an action brought under this 31 section, the court shall award all of the following: 32 a. Injunctive relief sufficient to prevent the defendant 33 from violating section 146F.3, 146F.5, or 146F.14. 34 b. Nominal and compensatory damages if the plaintiff has 35 -14- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 14/ 51 H.F. 666 suffered injury or harm from the defendantâs conduct, including 1 but not limited to loss of consortium and emotional distress. 2 c. Civil penalties in an amount of not less than ten 3 thousand dollars for each violation of section 146F.3, 146F.5, 4 or 146F.14. 5 d. Court costs and reasonable attorney fees. 6 5. Notwithstanding subsection 4, a court shall not award 7 relief under subsection 4, paragraph âcâ or âdâ , in response to 8 a violation of subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , if the defendant 9 demonstrates that a court has already ordered the defendant 10 to pay the full amount of civil penalties under subsection 4, 11 paragraph âcâ , in another action for that particular violation 12 of section 146F.3, 146F.5, or 146F.14. 13 6. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a person 14 may bring an action under this section no later than six years 15 from the date the cause of action accrues. 16 7. It is an affirmative defense if a person sued under this 17 section was unaware that the person was engaged in conduct 18 described in section 146F.3, 146F.5, or 146F.14 and took every 19 reasonable precaution to ensure that the person would not 20 violate section 146F.3, 146F.5, or 146F.14. 21 8. This section shall not be construed to impose liability 22 on speech or conduct protected by the first amendment to the 23 Constitution of the United States, as made applicable to the 24 states through the United States supreme court interpretations 25 of the fourteenth amendment to the Constitution of the United 26 States, or by Article I, section 7, of the Constitution of the 27 State of Iowa. 28 9. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a court 29 shall not award court costs or reasonable attorney fees to a 30 defendant under this section. 31 10. A person bringing an action under this section is 32 entitled to receive twenty-five percent of the civil penalties 33 recovered. The remainder of the recovered civil penalties 34 shall be paid to the state. 35 -15- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 15/ 51 H.F. 666 11. The state is not liable for expenses that a person 1 incurs in bringing an action under this section. 2 Sec. 9. NEW SECTION . 146F.8 Qui tam enforcement ââ 3 interactive computer services. 4 1. A person, other than a governmental entity or an officer 5 or employee of a governmental entity, has standing to bring and 6 may bring a qui tam action against a person that meets any of 7 the following conditions: 8 a. Provides or maintains an interactive computer service 9 that allows Iowa residents to access information or material 10 that assists or facilitates efforts to obtain elective 11 abortions or abortion-inducing drugs. 12 b. Provides or maintains a platform for downloading any 13 application or software for use on a computer or electronic 14 device that is designed to assist or facilitate efforts to 15 obtain elective abortions or abortion-inducing drugs. 16 c. Provides or maintains a platform that allows or enables 17 those who provide or aid or abet elective abortions, or those 18 who manufacture, mail, distribute, transport, deliver, or 19 provide abortion-inducing drugs, to collect money, digital 20 currency, resources, or any other thing of value in exchange 21 for such services. 22 2. An action under this section shall be brought in the name 23 of the person and the state. 24 3. Except as provided in subsection 4, if a plaintiff 25 prevails in an action brought under this section, the court 26 shall award only declaratory and injunctive relief. A court 27 shall not award damages in an action brought under this 28 section, even if the plaintiff demonstrates harm from the 29 defendantâs conduct, nor shall a court award a prevailing 30 plaintiff court costs or reasonable attorney fees. 31 4. Relief shall not be awarded under subsection 3 if the 32 civil action was brought in response to any of the following: 33 a. The exercise of state or federal constitutional rights 34 that belong personally to the defendant. 35 -16- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 16/ 51 H.F. 666 b. Conduct taken at the behest of a federal agency, 1 contractor, or employee that is carrying out duties under 2 federal law, if the relief authorized under subsection 3 3 would violate the doctrine of preemption or intergovernmental 4 immunity. 5 c. Conduct taken by a pregnant woman or formerly pregnant 6 woman who aborted or attempted to abort such womanâs unborn 7 child, if such woman is the named defendant in the civil 8 action. 9 5. a. It is an affirmative defense if a person who sued 10 under this section meets all of the following conditions: 11 (1) Was unaware that the personâs interactive computer 12 service or platform was being used to assist or facilitate 13 efforts to obtain elective abortions or abortion-inducing 14 drugs. 15 (2) Upon discovering that the personâs interactive computer 16 service or platform was being used to assist or facilitate 17 efforts to obtain elective abortions or abortion-inducing 18 drugs, the person took prompt action to block access to any 19 information, material, application, or software that assists 20 or facilitates efforts to obtain elective abortions or 21 abortion-inducing drugs; and to block those who provide or aid 22 or abet elective abortions and those who manufacture, mail, 23 distribute, transport, deliver, or provide abortion-inducing 24 drugs, from collecting money, digital currency, resources, or 25 any other thing of value in exchange for such services through 26 its interactive computer service or platform. 27 b. The defendant has the burden of proving an affirmative 28 defense under this subsection by a preponderance of the 29 evidence. 30 6. A person who engages in the conduct described under 31 subsection 1 shall not be subject to any of the following: 32 a. Held vicariously liable for any nominal, statutory, or 33 compensatory damages incurred by another information content 34 provider. 35 -17- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 17/ 51 H.F. 666 b. Held liable or legally responsible for the conduct of 1 a publisher or speaker of any information provided by another 2 information content provider. 3 c. Treated as the speaker or publisher of any information 4 provided by another information content provider under any 5 provision of state law. 6 7. a. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 7 requirements of this section shall be enforced exclusively 8 through the qui tam actions described in subsection 1. 9 b. Direct or indirect enforcement of this section shall 10 not be taken or threatened by a governmental entity or an 11 officer or employee of a governmental entity by any means, 12 and a violation of this section shall not be used to justify 13 or trigger the enforcement of any other law or any type of 14 adverse consequence under any other law, except as provided in 15 subsections 1, 2, and 3. 16 c. This section does not preclude or limit the enforcement 17 of any other law or regulation against conduct that is 18 independently prohibited by such other law or regulation, and 19 that would remain prohibited by such other law or regulation 20 in the absence of this section. 21 8. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a provider 22 or user of an interactive computer service shall have absolute 23 and nonwaivable immunity from liability or suit on account of 24 any of the following: 25 a. An action taken to restrict access to or availability of 26 information or material that assists or facilitates access to 27 elective abortions or abortion-inducing drugs, whether or not 28 such information or material is constitutionally protected. 29 b. An action taken to enable or make available to 30 information content providers or others the technical means 31 to restrict access to information or material described in 32 paragraph âaâ . 33 c. A denial of service to those who provide or aid or abet 34 elective abortions, or those who manufacture, mail, distribute, 35 -18- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 18/ 51 H.F. 666 transport, deliver, or provide abortion-inducing drugs. 1 9. The state is not liable for expenses that a person incurs 2 in bringing an action under this section. 3 Sec. 10. NEW SECTION . 146F.9 Affirmative defenses. 4 1. a. A defendant against whom an action is brought under 5 section 146F.6, 146F.7, or 146F.8 may assert an affirmative 6 defense to liability under this section if any of the following 7 conditions applies: 8 (1) The imposition of civil liability on the defendant 9 will violate federally protected rights, or state or federal 10 constitutional rights, that belong to the defendant personally. 11 (2) The defendant has standing to assert the rights 12 of a third party under the tests for third-party standing 13 established by the supreme court of the United States or the 14 supreme court, and demonstrates that the imposition of civil 15 liability on the defendant will violate federally protected 16 rights or state or federal constitutional rights belonging to 17 that third party. 18 (3) The imposition of civil liability on the defendant will 19 violate the Constitution of the State of Iowa. 20 (4) The imposition of civil liability on the defendant would 21 violate the limits on extraterritorial jurisdiction imposed by 22 the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of 23 the State of Iowa. 24 b. The defendant has the burden of proving the affirmative 25 defense in subsection 1 by a preponderance of the evidence. 26 2. This section shall not limit or preclude a defendant 27 from asserting the unconstitutionality of any provision or 28 application of state law as a defense to liability under 29 section 146F.6, 146F.7, or 146F.8, or from asserting any other 30 defense that might be available under any other source of law. 31 3. Notwithstanding any other law, a court shall not apply 32 the law of another state or jurisdiction to any civil action 33 brought under section 146F.6, 146F.7, or 146F.8, unless 34 otherwise required by law. 35 -19- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 19/ 51 H.F. 666 Sec. 11. NEW SECTION . 146F.10 Defenses not applicable. 1 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, none of the 2 following is a defense to an action brought under section 3 146F.4, 146F.6, or 146F.7: 4 1. Ignorance or mistake of law. 5 2. A defendantâs belief that the requirements or provisions 6 of this chapter are unconstitutional or were unconstitutional 7 when the cause of action accrued. 8 3. A defendantâs reliance on any court decision that 9 has been vacated, reversed, or overruled on appeal or by a 10 subsequent court, even if that court decision had not been 11 vacated, reversed, or overruled when the cause of action 12 accrued. 13 4. A defendantâs reliance on any state or federal court 14 decision that is not binding on the court in which the action 15 has been brought. 16 5. A defendantâs reliance on any federal statute, agency 17 rule or action, or treaty that has been repealed, superseded, 18 or declared invalid or unconstitutional, even if that federal 19 statute, agency rule or action, or treaty had not been 20 repealed, superseded, or declared invalid or unconstitutional 21 when the cause of action accrued. 22 6. Nonmutual issue preclusion or nonmutual claim 23 preclusion. 24 7. The consent of the plaintiff or the pregnant woman 25 or formerly pregnant woman, the consent of a parent of the 26 pregnant woman or formerly pregnant woman if such woman was an 27 unemancipated minor, or the consent of the legal guardian of 28 the pregnant woman or formerly pregnant woman to the elective 29 abortion. 30 8. Contributory or comparative negligence. 31 9. Assumption of risk. 32 10. Any claim that the enforcement of this chapter or 33 the imposition of civil liability against the defendant will 34 violate the constitutional rights of third parties, except as 35 -20- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 20/ 51 H.F. 666 provided by section 146F.9, subsection 1. 1 Sec. 12. NEW SECTION . 146F.11 Venue. 2 1. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, including 3 chapter 616, a civil action brought under section 146F.6, 4 146F.7, or 146F.8 may be brought in any of the following: 5 a. The county in which all or a substantial part of 6 the events or omissions giving rise to the cause of action 7 occurred. 8 b. The county of residence for any one of the natural person 9 defendants at the time the cause of action accrued. 10 c. The county of the principal office in this state of any 11 one of the defendants that is not a natural person. 12 d. The county of residence for the plaintiff if the 13 plaintiff is a natural person residing in the state. 14 2. If a civil action is brought under section 146F.6, 15 146F.7, or 146F.8 in any venue described in subsection 1, the 16 action shall not be transferred to a different venue without 17 the written consent of all parties. 18 Sec. 13. NEW SECTION . 146F.12 Personal jurisdiction ââ 19 choice of law ââ class action lawsuits. 20 1. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, including 21 section 617.3, the courts of this state shall have personal 22 jurisdiction over a defendant sued under section 146F.4, 23 146F.6, 146F.7, or 146F.8. 24 2. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, Iowa law 25 shall apply to any civil action brought under section 146F.4, 26 146F.6, 146F.7, or 146F.8. 27 3. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, including 28 rule of civil procedure 1.262, a civil action under this 29 section shall not be litigated on behalf of a plaintiff class 30 or a defendant class, and a court shall not certify a class 31 under rule of civil procedure 1.262 in any civil action brought 32 under section 146F.4, 146F.6, 146F.7, or 146F.8. 33 Sec. 14. NEW SECTION . 146F.13 Protection from counter 34 lawsuits. 35 -21- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 21/ 51 H.F. 666 If a lawsuit is brought or a judgment entered against a 1 person in any state or federal court, and the lawsuit or 2 liability in whole or in part is based on that personâs 3 decision or threat to bring an action under section 146F.6, 4 146F.7, or 146F.8, that person may recover damages from a party 5 that brought the action, obtained the judgment, or sought to 6 enforce the judgment. Recoverable damages shall include all 7 of the following: 8 1. Compensatory damages created by the lawsuit or judgment 9 including but not limited to monetary damages in the amount 10 of the judgment, and court costs, expenses, and reasonable 11 attorney fees expended in defending the action. 12 2. Court costs, expenses, and reasonable attorney fees 13 incurred in bringing an action under this section. 14 3. Additional statutory damages in an amount of not less 15 than one hundred thousand dollars. 16 Sec. 15. NEW SECTION . 146F.14 Government contractors and 17 grant recipients ââ qui tam liability. 18 1. A person that enters into a contract with a governmental 19 entity or a subcontract with a contractor of a governmental 20 entity, or that receives any grant or funding from a 21 governmental entity shall not pay for, reimburse, or subsidize 22 in any way the costs associated with an elective abortion, 23 regardless of the person upon whom the elective abortion is 24 performed, where the elective abortion is performed, or the 25 law of the jurisdiction in which the elective abortion is 26 performed, including by engaging in any of the following acts: 27 a. Providing coverage of elective abortions as an employee 28 benefit. 29 b. Paying for, reimbursing, or subsidizing the travel costs 30 associated with obtaining an elective abortion, or covering 31 those costs as an employee benefit. 32 c. Donating or lending money, digital currency, resources, 33 or any other thing of value to an abortion provider, abortion 34 fund, or an affiliate of an abortion provider, either directly 35 -22- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 22/ 51 H.F. 666 or by laundering the donation or loan through an intermediary. 1 d. Offering, providing, or lending money, digital currency, 2 resources, or any other thing of value with the knowledge 3 that the thing of value will be used to pay for, offset, or 4 reimburse the costs of an elective abortion or the costs 5 associated with procuring an elective abortion. 6 e. Performing or providing any type of work or service for 7 an abortion provider, abortion fund, or an affiliate of an 8 abortion provider, regardless of whether such work or service 9 is done on a paid, contract, or volunteer basis, except for 10 the provision of basic public services, including fire and 11 police protection and utilities, by a governmental entity or a 12 common carrier to an abortion provider, an abortion fund, or 13 an affiliate of an abortion provider in the same manner as the 14 governmental entity or common carrier provides the services to 15 the general public. 16 f. Paying, offering to pay, or providing insurance that 17 covers legal expenses, court judgments, or settlements of those 18 who violate the abortion laws of the United States, or the 19 abortion laws of any state, local, or foreign jurisdiction. 20 g. Engaging in any conduct that would constitute aiding and 21 abetting an elective abortion, regardless of the person upon 22 whom the elective abortion is performed, where the elective 23 abortion is performed, or the law of the jurisdiction in which 24 the elective abortion is performed. 25 2. A person shall not enter into a contract with a 26 governmental entity, enter into a subcontract with a contractor 27 of a governmental entity, or receive any grant or funding from 28 a governmental entity, unless the person certifies in writing 29 that the person complies with each of the requirements in 30 subsection 1. 31 3. A person that violates subsection 1 after entering 32 into a contract with a governmental entity, entering into a 33 subcontract with a contractor of a governmental entity, or 34 receiving any type of grant or funding from a governmental 35 -23- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 23/ 51 H.F. 666 entity, shall be subject to qui tam liability as provided in 1 section 146F.7. 2 Sec. 16. NEW SECTION . 146F.15 Internet service providers ââ 3 blocking access to certain information ââ immunity ââ recoverable 4 damages resulting from lawsuit. 5 1. An internet service provider that provides service in the 6 state shall make all reasonable and technologically feasible 7 efforts to block access to all of the following: 8 a. Child pornography as defined in 18 U.S.C. Â§2256(8). 9 b. Information or material intended to assist or facilitate 10 efforts to obtain elective abortions or abortion-inducing drugs 11 including but not limited to the following: 12 (1) An internet site, platform, or other interactive 13 computer service operated by or on behalf of an abortion 14 provider or abortion fund. 15 (2) An internet site, platform, or other interactive 16 computer service for downloading any application or software 17 for use on a computer or electronic device that is designed to 18 assist or facilitate efforts to obtain elective abortions or 19 abortion-inducing drugs. 20 (3) An internet site, platform, or other interactive 21 computer service that allows or enables those who provide or 22 aid or abet elective abortions, or those who manufacture, mail, 23 distribute, transport, deliver, or provide abortion-inducing 24 drugs, to collect money, digital currency, resources, or any 25 other thing of value in exchange for such services. 26 2. A person who becomes aware that information or material 27 described in subsection 1 is accessible through internet 28 service provided by an entity that provides internet service 29 in the state may notify that internet service provider and 30 request that the internet service provider block access to the 31 information or material. A person may provide notification by 32 any of the following means: 33 a. Calling the internet service providerâs customer support 34 number and providing a precise description and location of the 35 -24- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 24/ 51 H.F. 666 information or material described in subsection 1. 1 b. Mailing a letter to the internet service provider and 2 providing a precise description and location of the information 3 or material described in subsection 1. 4 3. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, direct 5 or indirect enforcement of this section shall not be taken 6 or threatened by a governmental entity, or by an officer or 7 employee of a governmental entity, by any means. However, 8 the state, its political subdivisions, and officers and 9 employees of the state and its political subdivisions may ask 10 or encourage internet service providers to comply with the 11 provisions of this section. 12 4. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, an 13 internet service provider shall have absolute and nonwaivable 14 immunity from liability or suit on account of any of the 15 following: 16 a. An action taken to comply with the requirements of this 17 section, or to restrict access to or availability of any of the 18 information or material described in subsection 1. 19 b. An action taken to enable or make available to 20 information content providers or others the technical means 21 to restrict access to information or material described in 22 subsection 1. 23 c. A denial of service to those who use or seek to use the 24 internet to make available information or material described in 25 subsection 1. 26 5. If a lawsuit is brought or a judgment entered against an 27 internet service provider in any state or federal court, and 28 the lawsuit or liability in whole or in part is based on the 29 internet service providerâs compliance with the requirements of 30 this section, the internet service provider may recover damages 31 from a party that brought the action, obtained that judgment, 32 or sought to enforce that judgment. Recoverable damages shall 33 include all of the following: 34 a. Compensatory damages created by the lawsuit or judgment, 35 -25- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 25/ 51 H.F. 666 including but not limited to monetary damages in the amount of 1 the judgment, expenses, and reasonable attorney fees spent in 2 defending the action. 3 b. Court costs, expenses, and reasonable attorney fees 4 incurred in bringing an action under this section. 5 c. Additional statutory damages in an amount not less than 6 one hundred thousand dollars. 7 Sec. 17. NEW SECTION . 146F.16 Internet service in publicly 8 owned buildings ââ public libraries and school districts 9 and institutions of higher education ââ access to certain 10 information. 11 1. A publicly owned building in the state that provides 12 internet service shall be equipped to operate a technology 13 protection measure with respect to each of the computers with 14 internet access in the publicly owned building that protects 15 against access through those computers to all of the following: 16 a. Child pornography as defined in 18 U.S.C. Â§2256(8). 17 b. Information or material that is intended to assist 18 or facilitate efforts to obtain elective abortions or 19 abortion-inducing drugs, including but not limited to the 20 following interactive computer services: 21 (1) An internet site, platform, or other interactive 22 computer service operated by or on behalf of an abortion 23 provider or abortion fund. 24 (2) An internet site, platform, or other interactive 25 computer service for downloading any application or software 26 for use on a computer or electronic device that is designed to 27 assist or facilitate efforts to obtain elective abortions or 28 abortion-inducing drugs. 29 (3) An internet site, platform, or other interactive 30 computer service that allows or enables those who provide or 31 aid or abet elective abortions, or those who manufacture, mail, 32 distribute, transport, deliver, or provide abortion-inducing 33 drugs, to collect money, digital currency, resources, or any 34 other thing of value in exchange for such services. 35 -26- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 26/ 51 H.F. 666 2. A person who becomes aware that information or material 1 described in subsection 1 is accessible through internet 2 service provided by a government-owned building, public 3 library location, school district location, or location of an 4 institution of higher education governed by the state board of 5 regents in the state may notify an administrator, supervisor, 6 or other authority with control over the building or location 7 and request that the authority block access to that information 8 or material. 9 3. An administrator, supervisor, or other authority 10 may disable a technology protection measure that blocks the 11 information specified under subsection 1 to enable access for 12 bona fide research or other lawful purposes. 13 Sec. 18. NEW SECTION . 146F.17 Governmental entities and 14 political subdivisions ââ prohibitions relating to elective 15 abortion and taxpayer resource transactions ââ qui tam actions. 16 1. a. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 17 a political subdivision may enact and enforce ordinances 18 regulating, restricting, or prohibiting elective abortion and 19 conduct that aids or abets elective abortion. 20 b. A provision of state law shall not be construed to limit 21 a political subdivision from enacting or enforcing ordinances 22 regulating, restricting, or prohibiting elective abortion and 23 conduct that aids or abets elective abortion, unless it clearly 24 and explicitly does so with specific reference to this section. 25 2. A governmental entity shall not enter into a taxpayer 26 resource transaction with any of the following: 27 a. An abortion fund. 28 b. An abortion provider. 29 c. An affiliate of an abortion provider. 30 d. A person who pays for, reimburses, or subsidizes in any 31 way the costs associated with an elective abortion, regardless 32 of the person upon whom the elective abortion is performed, 33 where the elective abortion is performed, and the law of the 34 jurisdiction in which the elective abortion is performed, 35 -27- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 27/ 51 H.F. 666 unless required to do so by federal law or as a condition of 1 receiving federal funds. 2 3. a. A person has standing to bring and may bring a qui 3 tam action against a person that enacts, issues, enforces, or 4 attempts to enforce any ordinance, order, rule, directive, 5 requirement, or written or unwritten policy described 6 in subsection 1, or that enters into a taxpayer resource 7 transaction described in subsection 2. An action under this 8 section shall be brought in the name of the person and the 9 state. 10 b. A plaintiff who prevails in a qui tam action brought 11 under this section shall recover all of the following: 12 (1) Declaratory and injunctive relief. 13 (2) Nominal and compensatory damages if the plaintiff has 14 suffered injury or harm from the defendantâs conduct. 15 (3) Civil penalties in an amount of not less than ten 16 thousand dollars for each ordinance, order, rule, directive, 17 requirement, or written or unwritten policy that the defendant 18 enacted, issued, enforced, or attempted to enforce in violation 19 of subsection 1 and for each prohibited taxpayer resource 20 transaction that the defendant entered into in violation of 21 subsection 2. 22 (4) Court costs and reasonable attorney fees. 23 4. Notwithstanding subsection 3, a court shall not award 24 relief under subsection 3, paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (3) or 25 (4), if the defendant demonstrates that a court has already 26 ordered the defendant to pay the full amount of civil penalties 27 under subsection 3, paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (3), in another 28 action for that particular taxpayer resource transaction that 29 the defendant entered in violation of subsection 2. 30 5. Sovereign immunity, governmental immunity, and official 31 immunity are waived and abrogated in any lawsuit brought under 32 subsection 3, and shall not be asserted as a defense in those 33 proceedings. 34 6. A person bringing an action under this section is 35 -28- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 28/ 51 H.F. 666 entitled to receive twenty-five percent of the civil penalties 1 recovered. The remainder of the recovered civil penalties 2 shall be paid to the state. 3 7. The state is not liable for expenses that a person incurs 4 in bringing an action under this section. 5 Sec. 19. NEW SECTION . 146F.18 Medicaid ââ persons qualified 6 to perform services. 7 1. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 8 following persons shall not be deemed persons qualified to 9 perform the service or services required as described under 42 10 U.S.C. Â§1396a(a)(23) under the Medicaid program: 11 a. A person engaged in a pattern of racketeering activity as 12 defined in 18 U.S.C. Â§1961 and Â§1962, including racketeering 13 activity that violates 18 U.S.C. Â§1461 and 18 U.S.C. Â§1462(c). 14 b. A person that performs or participates in an elective 15 abortion in violation of the laws of this state or in violation 16 of the laws of another state. 17 c. An abortion provider or affiliate of an abortion 18 provider. 19 2. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the state 20 and its officers and employees shall have sovereign immunity in 21 any lawsuit brought to restrain the state and its officers and 22 employees from enforcing subsection 1. 23 3. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, an 24 attorney representing the state, its political subdivisions, or 25 an officer or employee of the state or a political subdivision 26 shall not waive the immunity described in subsection 2 or take 27 any action that would result in a waiver of that immunity, and 28 any such action or purported waiver shall be a legal nullity 29 and an ultra vires act. 30 Sec. 20. NEW SECTION . 146F.19 Costs of lawsuits for 31 injunctive or declaratory relief relating to restrictions on 32 elective abortions ââ payment to prevailing party. 33 1. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a person 34 that seeks declaratory or injunctive relief to prevent the 35 -29- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 29/ 51 H.F. 666 state, a political subdivision, an officer or employee of 1 the state or a political subdivision, or a person in this 2 state from enforcing or bringing suit to enforce any statute, 3 ordinance, rule, regulation, or any other type of law that 4 regulates or restricts elective abortion or that limits 5 taxpayer funding for a person that performs or promotes 6 elective abortion in any state or federal court, or that 7 represents a litigant seeking relief in any state or federal 8 court, is jointly and severally liable to pay the court costs 9 and reasonable attorney fees of the prevailing party, including 10 the court costs and reasonable attorney fees the prevailing 11 party incurs in the prevailing partyâs efforts to recover such 12 court costs and reasonable attorney fees. 13 2. For purposes of this section, a party is considered a 14 prevailing party if a state or federal court does any of the 15 following: 16 a. Dismisses any claim or cause of action brought against 17 the party that seeks the declaratory or injunctive relief 18 described in subsection 1, regardless of the reason for the 19 dismissal. 20 b. Enters a judgment in the partyâs favor on any such claim 21 or cause of action. 22 3. A prevailing party may recover court costs and reasonable 23 attorney fees under this section only to the extent that those 24 court costs and attorney fees were incurred while defending 25 claims or causes of action on which the party prevailed. 26 4. Regardless of whether a prevailing party sought to 27 recover court costs or reasonable attorney fees in the 28 underlying action, a prevailing party under this section may 29 bring a civil action to recover court costs and reasonable 30 attorney fees against a person that sought declaratory or 31 injunctive relief described in subsection 1 not later than 32 three years from the date on which any of the following occurs, 33 as applicable: 34 a. The dismissal or judgment described in subsection 2 35 -30- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 30/ 51 H.F. 666 becomes final on the conclusion of appellate review. 1 b. The time for seeking appellate review expires. 2 5. It is not a defense to an action brought under subsection 3 4 that any of the following applies: 4 a. A prevailing party under this section failed to seek 5 recovery of court costs or reasonable attorney fees in the 6 underlying action. 7 b. The court in the underlying action declined to recognize 8 or enforce the requirements of this section. 9 c. The court in the underlying action held that any 10 provision of this section is invalid, unconstitutional, or 11 preempted by federal law, notwithstanding the doctrines of 12 issue or claim preclusion. 13 6. a. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 14 including chapter 616, a civil action brought under subsection 15 4 may be brought in any of the following: 16 (1) The county in which all or a substantial part of 17 the events or omissions giving rise to the cause of action 18 occurred. 19 (2) The county of residence for any one of the natural 20 person defendants at the time the cause of action accrued. 21 (3) The county of the principal office in this state of any 22 one of the defendants that is not a natural person. 23 (4) The county of residence for the plaintiff if the 24 plaintiff is a natural person residing in this state. 25 b. Any contractual choice-of-forum provision that purports 26 to require a civil action under subsection 4 to be litigated 27 in a forum other than as specified in paragraph âaâ shall be 28 void as against public policy, and shall not be enforced in any 29 state or federal court. 30 7. If a civil action is brought under subsection 4 in 31 any venue described in subsection 6, the action shall not be 32 transferred to a different venue without the written consent 33 of all parties. 34 Sec. 21. NEW SECTION . 146F.20 Immunity from suit and limits 35 -31- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 31/ 51 H.F. 666 on state court jurisdiction. 1 1. a. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 2 state, its political subdivisions, or an officer or employee 3 of this state or a political subdivision shall have sovereign 4 immunity, governmental immunity, and official immunity, as 5 applicable, in any action, claim, counterclaim, or any type 6 of legal or equitable action that challenges the validity of 7 any provision or application of this chapter on constitutional 8 grounds or otherwise, or that seeks to prevent or enjoin the 9 state, its political subdivisions, or an officer or employee 10 of this state or a political subdivision from enforcing any 11 provision or application of this chapter, or from hearing, 12 adjudicating, or docketing a civil action brought under section 13 146F.6, 146F.7, or 146F.8, unless that immunity has been 14 abrogated or preempted by federal law. 15 b. The sovereign immunity conferred by this section upon 16 the state and each of its officers and employees includes 17 the constitutional sovereign immunity which applies in both 18 state and federal court and which may not be abrogated by the 19 congress of the United States or by any state or federal court 20 except pursuant to legislation authorized by section 5 of the 21 fourteenth amendment to the Constitution of the United States. 22 2. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 23 immunities conferred by subsection 1 shall apply in every 24 court, both state and federal, and in every adjudicative 25 proceeding of any type. 26 3. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a 27 provision of state law shall not be construed to waive or 28 abrogate an immunity described in subsection 1 unless the 29 provision expressly waives or abrogates immunity with specific 30 reference to this section. 31 4. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, an 32 attorney representing the state, its political subdivisions, or 33 an officer or employee of this state or a political subdivision 34 shall not waive an immunity described in subsection 1 or take 35 -32- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 32/ 51 H.F. 666 any action that would result in a waiver of that immunity, and 1 any such action or purported waiver shall be a legal nullity 2 and an ultra vires act. 3 5. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, including 4 rule of civil procedure 1.1101, and sections 602.4102, 5 602.5103, and 602.6101, a court of this state shall not award 6 declaratory or injunctive relief or any type of writ that 7 would pronounce any provision or application of this chapter 8 invalid or unconstitutional, or that would restrain the state, 9 its political subdivisions, an officer or employee of this 10 state or a political subdivision, or a person from enforcing 11 any provision or application of this chapter, or from hearing, 12 adjudicating, docketing, or filing a civil action brought under 13 section 146F.6, 146F.7, or 146F.8, and a court of this state 14 shall not have jurisdiction to consider any action, claim, or 15 counterclaim that seeks such relief. 16 6. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any 17 judicial relief issued by a court of this state that disregards 18 the immunities conferred by subsection 1, or the jurisdictional 19 limitations specified by subsection 5, shall be a legal nullity 20 due to lack of jurisdiction, and shall not be enforced or 21 obeyed by an officer or employee of this state or a political 22 subdivision, judicial or otherwise. 23 7. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any 24 injunction, declaratory judgment, or writ issued by a court 25 of this state that purports to restrain the state, its 26 political subdivisions, an officer or employee of this state 27 or a political subdivision, or any person from hearing, 28 adjudicating, docketing, or filing a civil action brought under 29 section 146F.6, 146F.7, or 146F.8, shall be a legal nullity 30 and a violation of the due process clause of the fourteenth 31 amendment of the Constitution of the United States, and shall 32 not be enforced or obeyed by an officer or employee of this 33 state or a political subdivision, judicial or otherwise. 34 8. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, an officer 35 -33- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 33/ 51 H.F. 666 or employee of this state or a political subdivision, judicial 1 or otherwise, who issues, enforces, or obeys an injunction, 2 declaratory judgment, or writ described in subsection 7 shall 3 be subject to suit by a person who is prevented from or delayed 4 in bringing a civil action under section 146F.6, 146F.7, or 5 146F.8, and a plaintiff who prevails in an action brought under 6 this section shall be awarded and recover all of the following: 7 a. Injunctive relief. 8 b. Compensatory damages. 9 c. Punitive damages of not less than one hundred thousand 10 dollars. 11 d. Court costs and reasonable attorney fees. 12 9. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a person 13 who violates subsection 5 or 7 is prohibited from all of the 14 following: 15 a. Asserting and being entitled to any type of immunity 16 defense, including sovereign immunity, governmental immunity, 17 official immunity, or judicial immunity. 18 b. Being indemnified for any award of damages, court costs, 19 and reasonable attorney fees entered against the person, or for 20 the costs of the personâs legal defense. 21 c. Receiving or obtaining legal representation from the 22 attorney general of this state in any action brought under 23 subsection 8. 24 10. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a person 25 who sues and seeks any injunction, declaratory judgment, or 26 writ that would restrain a person from hearing, adjudicating, 27 docketing, or filing a civil action brought under section 28 146F.6, 146F.7, or 146F.8, shall pay the court costs and 29 reasonable attorney fees of the person sued. A person may 30 bring a civil action to recover the court costs and reasonable 31 attorney fees in state or federal court. It shall not be a 32 defense to a civil action brought under this subsection that 33 any of the following applies: 34 a. The plaintiff failed to seek recovery of court costs or 35 -34- LSB 2020YH (3) 91 lh/ko 34/ 51 H.F. 666 attorney fees in the underlying action. 1 b. The court in the underlying action declined to recognize 2 or enforce the requirements of this section. 3 c. The court in the underlying action held any provision 4 of this section invalid, unconstitutional, or preempted by 5 federal law, notwithstanding the doctrines of issue or claim 6 preclusion. 7 Sec. 22. NEW SECTION . 146F.21 Pregnant woman not subject to 8 criminal or civil action, penalties, or liability. 9 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, this chapter 10 shall not be construed to subject a pregnant woman or formerly 11 pregnant woman on whom an elective abortion was performed or 12 attempted to be performed to any of the following: 13 1. Any civil or criminal action under this chapter. 14 2. Any type of criminal or civil penalty or liability under 15 this chapter. 16 Sec. 23. SEVERABILITY. 17 1. If any provision of this Act or its application to 18 any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidation 19 does not affect other provisions or applications of this Act 20 which can be given effect without the invalid provision or 21 application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are 22 severable. 23 2. A court shall not decline to enforce the severability 24 requirements of this section on the ground that severance 25 would rewrite the statute or involve a court in legislative or 26 lawmaking activity. 27 Sec. 24. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of 28 immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 29